Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.040

Duty of county commissioners.

The board of county commissioners upon receipt of the certified copy of said petition, and the request aforesaid, shall cause the same to be filed in the office of the county auditor and forthwith proceed to examine the boundaries of the town and make the same definite and certain. For this purpose they may employ a competent surveyor, and shall commence at some recognized and undisputed point on the boundary line of the town, if such there be, and if there is no such recognized and undisputed point, they shall establish a starting point from the best data at their command and from such starting point they shall run a boundary line by courses and distances around such town, in one tract or body.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.27.040. Prior: 1899 c 79 s 2; RRS s 9196.]